West Virginia, session 2026, HB5490.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. PARKS AND RECREATION. §20-5-20. Green fee discount for West Virginia residents. (a) The director shall provide to West Virginia residents a 20 percent discount at all state parks that have golf courses on low play days of Mondays, Tuesdays, and Wednesdays..(b) The director shall propose rules for legislative approval in accordance with the §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement the provisions of subsection (a) of this section. The rules shall include the requirement that residents desiring to use the greens on the stated days have a valid driver's license or Real ID.  The director may exclude traditional peak periods of occupancy at state parks from the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, and may otherwise place reasonable limits on the use of the golf courses at state parks pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.